Utah statutes.
67-19e-105.   Performance evaluation of administrative law judges.

(1)  Beginning January 1, 2014, the department shall prepare a performance evaluation for each administrative law judge contracted or employed by a state agency.

(2)  The performance evaluation for an administrative law judge shall include:

(a)  the results of the administrative law judge's performance evaluations conducted by the employing agency since the administrative law judge's last performance evaluation conducted by the department in accordance with the performance evaluation procedure for the agency;

(b)  information from the employing agency concerning the administrative law judge's compliance with minimum performance standards;

(c)  the administrative law judge's disciplinary record, if any;

(d)  the results of any performance surveys conducted since the administrative law judge's last performance review conducted by the department; and

(e)  any other factor that the department considers relevant to evaluating the administrative law judge's performance.

(3)  If an administrative law judge fails to meet the minimum performance standards the department shall provide a copy of the performance evaluation and survey to the employing agency.

(4)  The department shall conduct performance reviews every four years for administrative law judges contracted or employed by an agency.



Enacted by Chapter 165, 2013 General Session

